Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 81
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS
EDUCATION, PREVENTION, AND TREATMENT

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of part 3 of article 1 of title 25. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For placement of a person in a state-approved treatment facility for alcohol use disorders after he or she has been arrested and charged for driving under the influence, see § 42-4-1705 (3).

Section

27-81-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly recognizes the character and pervasiveness of substance use disorders and that substance use disorders are serious problems. The general assembly further finds and declares that these problems have been very seriously neglected and that the social and economic costs and the waste of human resources caused by substance use disorders are massive, tragic, and no longer acceptable. The general assembly believes that the best interests of this state demand an across-the-board, locally oriented attack on the massive problems of drug abuse and substance use disorders. The attack includes prevention, education, and treatment, and this article 81 provides a base from which to launch the attack and reduce the tragic human loss.

It is the policy of this state that persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs should be afforded treatment so they may lead normal lives as productive members of society. The general assembly finds and declares that substance use disorders are matters of statewide concern.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 732, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1362, § 270, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1392, § 11, effective July 13.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-82-101 as it existed prior to 2020.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 81, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrator" means the administrator of an approved treatment facility or an individual authorized in writing to act as the administrator's designee.

(1.2) "Alcohol use disorder" means a chronic relapsing brain disease characterized by recurrent use of alcohol causing clinically significant impairment, including health problems, disability, and failure to meet major responsibilities at work, school, and home.

"Approved private treatment facility" means a private agency meeting the standards prescribed in section 27-81-106 (1) and approved under section 27-81-106.

"Approved public treatment facility" means a treatment agency operating under the direction and control of or approved by the BHA or providing treatment pursuant to this article 81 through a contract with the BHA pursuant to section 27-81-105 (7) and meeting the standards prescribed in section 27-81-106 (1) and approved pursuant to section 27-81-106.

(3.3) "Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

(3.5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.5) is effective until July 1, 2024.

]

"Behavioral health entity" means a facility or provider organization engaged in providing community-based health services, which may include behavioral health disorder services, alcohol use disorder services, or substance use disorder services, including crisis stabilization, acute or ongoing treatment, or community mental health center services as described in section 27-66-101 (2) and (3), but does not include:

Residential child care facilities as defined in section 26-6-903; or

Services provided by a licensed or certified mental health-care provider under the provider's individual professional practice act on the provider's own premises.

(3.5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Behavioral health entity" has the same meaning as defined in section 27-50-101.

(3.7) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration.

"Court" means the district court in the county in which the person named in a petition filed pursuant to this article resides or is physically present. In the city and county of Denver, "court" means the probate court.

"Department" means the department of human services created in section 26-1-105, C.R.S.

Repealed.

(6.5) "Drug" means a controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), and toxic vapors.

"Emergency service patrol" means a patrol established under section 27-81-115.

Repealed.

"Incapacitated by alcohol" means that a person, as a result of the use of alcohol, is unconscious, has his or her judgment otherwise so impaired that he or she is incapable of realizing and making a rational decision with respect to his or her need for treatment, is unable to take care of his or her basic personal needs or safety, or lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate rational decisions about himself or herself.

(9.2) "Incapacitated by drugs" means that a person, as a result of the use of drugs, is unconscious or has judgment otherwise so impaired that the person is incapable of realizing and making a rational decision with respect to the person's need for treatment, is unable to take care of basic personal needs or safety, or lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate rational decisions concerning himself or herself.

(9.4) "Incapacitated by substances" means that a person is incapacitated by alcohol or is incapacitated by drugs.

Repealed.

"Intoxicated person" or "person intoxicated by alcohol" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is temporarily but substantially impaired as a result of the presence of alcohol in his or her body.

"Licensed physician" means either a physician licensed by the state of Colorado or a hospital-licensed physician employed by the admitting facility.

"Minor" means a person under the age of eighteen years.

(13.5) Repealed.

(13.6) "Person under the influence of drugs" means any person whose mental or physical functioning is temporarily but substantially impaired as a result of the presence of drugs in the person's body.

(13.7) "Public funds" means money appropriated to the behavioral health administration by the general assembly or any other governmental or private sources for withdrawal management in approved facilities pursuant to this article 81.

(13.8) "Substance use disorder" means a chronic relapsing brain disease, characterized by recurrent use of alcohol, drugs, or both, causing clinically significant impairment, including health problems, disability, and failure to meet major responsibilities at work, school, or home.

(13.9) "Toxic vapors" means a substance or product containing such substances as defined in section 18-18-412 (3).

"Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, outpatient, intermediate, and inpatient services and care, including diagnostic evaluation, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation, and career counseling that may be extended to a person with a substance use disorder, a person incapacitated by substances, a person under the influence of drugs, and a person intoxicated by alcohol.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 732, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2011:

(10) repealed, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1172, § 81, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP, (1), (3), (6), and (14) amended, (13.5) added, and (15) repealed, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1362, § 271, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1) amended and (3.5) and (13.7) added, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3644, § 20, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2020:

(1) and (14) amended and (1.2), (6.5), (9.2), (9.4), (13.6), (13.8), and (13.9) added, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1392, § 12, effective July 13.

L. 2021:

(13.8) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2803, § 26, effective July 2.

L. 2022:

(3) and (13.7) amended, (3.3) and (3.7) added, and (6), (8) and (13.5) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1568, § 176, effective July 1; (3.5)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 864, § 120, effective July 1; (3.5) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1595, § 239, effective July 1, 2024.

27-81-103. Powers of the behavioral health administration.

To carry out the purposes of this article 81, the BHA may:

Plan, establish, and maintain substance use disorder treatment programs as necessary or desirable;

Make contracts necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including contracts with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals to pay them for services rendered or furnished to persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, or persons under the influence of drugs;

Solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will or otherwise and any grant of money, services, or property from the federal government, the state, or any political subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies in making an application for any grant;

Administer or supervise the administration of the provisions relating to persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs of any state plan submitted for federal funding pursuant to federal health, welfare, or treatment legislation;

Coordinate its activities and cooperate with substance use disorder treatment programs in this state and other states and make contracts and other joint or cooperative arrangements with state, local, or private agencies in this state and other states for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs and for the common advancement of substance use disorder treatment programs;

Keep records and engage in research and the gathering of relevant statistics;

Do other acts and things necessary or convenient to execute the authority expressly granted to it; and

Acquire, hold, or dispose of real property, or any interest therein, and construct, lease, or otherwise provide substance use disorder treatment facilities for persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 733, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(h) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1363, § 272, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(h) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1394, § 13, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1569, § 177, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-303 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-104. Duties of the behavioral health administration - review.

The BHA shall:

Develop, encourage, and foster statewide, regional, and local plans and programs for the prevention of substance use disorders and treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs, in cooperation with public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals, and provide technical assistance and consultation services for these purposes;

Coordinate the efforts and enlist the assistance of all public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals interested in prevention of substance use disorders and treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs;

Utilize behavioral health entities, community mental health centers and clinics, or other approved treatment facilities, whenever feasible;

Cooperate with the department of corrections in establishing and conducting programs for the prevention of substance use disorders and treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs in appropriate agencies and institutions and for persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs in or on parole from correctional institutions and in carrying out duties specified in subsections (1)(i) and (1)(k) of this section;

Cooperate with the department of education, schools, police departments, courts, and other public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals in establishing programs for the prevention of substance use disorders and treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs and preparing curriculum materials for use at all levels of school education;

Prepare, publish, evaluate, and disseminate educational material dealing with the nature and effects of alcohol and drugs;

Develop and implement, as an integral part of substance use disorder treatment programs, an educational program for use in the treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs. The program must include the dissemination of information concerning the nature and effects of alcohol and drugs.

Organize and foster training programs for all persons engaged in treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs;

Sponsor and encourage research into the causes and nature of substance use disorders and treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs, and serve as a clearinghouse for information relating to substance use disorders;

Specify uniform methods for keeping statistical information by public and private agencies, organizations, and individuals and collect and make available relevant statistical information, including number of persons treated, frequency of admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment;

Advise the governor in the preparation of a comprehensive plan for treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs for inclusion in the state's comprehensive health plan;

Review all state health, welfare, and treatment plans to be submitted for federal funding under federal legislation and advise the governor on provisions to be included relating to substance use disorders, persons with substance use disorders, and persons under the influence of drugs;

Assist in the development of, and cooperate with, substance use education and treatment programs for employees of state and local governments and businesses and industries in this state;

Utilize the support and assistance of interested persons in the community, particularly persons with substance use disorders that are in remission, to encourage persons with substance use disorders to voluntarily undergo treatment;

Cooperate with the department of transportation in establishing and conducting programs designed to deal with the problem of persons operating motor vehicles while under the influence of, or impaired by, alcohol or drugs;

Encourage general hospitals and other appropriate health facilities to admit without discrimination persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs and to provide them with adequate and appropriate treatment;

Encourage all health and disability insurance programs to include substance use disorders as a covered illness;

Submit to the governor an annual report covering the activities of the BHA; and

Train emergency departments and certified peace officers in the procedures required pursuant to sections 27-81-111 and 27-81-112.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 734, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1364, § 273, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3645, § 21, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1394, § 14, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(r) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1569, § 178, effective July 1; IP(1), (1)(q), and (1)(r) amended and (1)(s) added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1671, § 52 effective July 1.

27-81-105. Comprehensive program for treatment - regional facilities.

The BHA shall establish a comprehensive and coordinated program for the treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs.

Insofar as money available to the BHA permits, the program established in subsection (1) of this section must include all of the following:

Emergency treatment;

Inpatient treatment;

Intermediate treatment; and

Outpatient and follow-up treatment.

The BHA shall provide adequate and appropriate treatment for persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs admitted pursuant to sections 27-81-109 to 27-81-112. Except as otherwise provided in section 27-81-111, treatment must not be provided at a correctional institution, except for inmates.

The BHA shall maintain, supervise, and control all facilities it operates subject to policies of the department. The administrator of each facility shall make an annual report of the facility's activities to the commissioner in the form and manner specified by the commissioner.

All appropriate public and private resources shall be coordinated with and utilized in the program if possible.

The commissioner shall prepare, publish, and distribute annually a list of all approved public and private treatment facilities.

The BHA may contract for the use of any facility as an approved public treatment facility if the commissioner, subject to the policies of the department, considers it to be an effective and economical course to follow.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 736, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1), IP(2), (3), (4), and (7) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1366, § 274, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1396, § 15, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

(1), IP(2), (3), (4), (6), and (7) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1569, § 179, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-305 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-106. Standards for public and private treatment facilities - fees - enforcement procedures - penalties.

In accordance with the provisions of this article 81, the BHA shall establish standards for approved treatment facilities that receive public funds. A treatment facility shall meet the established standards to be approved as a public or private treatment facility. The BHA shall fix the fees to be charged for the required inspections. The fees charged to approved treatment facilities that provide level I and level II programs, as provided in section 42-4-1301.3 (3)(c), must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the alcohol and drug driving safety program fund created in section 42-4-1301.3 (4)(a). The standards may concern only health standards to be met and standards of treatment to be afforded patients and must reflect the success criteria established by the general assembly.

The BHA shall periodically inspect approved public and private treatment facilities at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner.

The BHA shall maintain a list of approved public and private treatment facilities.

Each approved public and private treatment facility shall file with the BHA, on request, data, statistics, schedules, and any other information the BHA reasonably requires. The commissioner shall remove from the list of approved treatment facilities an approved public or private treatment facility that fails, without good cause, to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or other information, as requested, or files fraudulent returns.

The BHA, after a hearing, may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or refuse to grant an approval for failure to meet its standards.

A person shall not operate a private or public treatment facility in this state without approval from the BHA; except that this article 81 does not apply to a private treatment facility that accepts only private money and does not dispense controlled substances. The district court may restrain any violation of, review any denial, restriction, or revocation of approval under, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of this section.

Upon petition of the BHA and after a hearing held upon reasonable notice to the facility, the district court may issue a warrant to an officer or employee of the BHA authorizing the officer or employee to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and accounts of, any approved public or private treatment facility that refuses to consent to inspection or examination by the BHA or which the BHA has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of this article 81.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 736, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1366, § 275, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(6) R&RE, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1397, § 16, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1570, § 180, effective July 1.

27-81-107. Compliance with local government zoning regulations - notice to local governments - provisional approval - repeal.

Prior to July 1, 2024, the BHA shall require any residential treatment facility seeking approval as a public or private treatment facility pursuant to this article 81 to comply with any applicable zoning regulations of the municipality, city and county, or county where the facility is situated. Failure to comply with applicable zoning regulations constitutes grounds for the denial of approval of a facility.

The BHA shall ensure that timely written notice is provided to the municipality, city and county, or county where a residential treatment facility is situated, including the address of the facility and the population and number of persons to be served by the facility, when any of the following occurs:

An application for approval of a residential treatment facility pursuant to section 27-81-106 is made;

Approval is granted to a residential treatment facility pursuant to section 27-81-106;

A change in the approval of a residential treatment facility occurs; or

The approval of a residential treatment facility is revoked or otherwise terminated for any reason.

In the event of a zoning or other delay or dispute between a residential treatment facility and the municipality, city and county, or county where the facility is situated, the BHA may grant provisional approval of the facility for up to one hundred twenty days pending resolution of the delay or dispute.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 737, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1), IP(2), and (3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1367, § 276, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1) amended and (4) added, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3645, § 22, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1), IP(2), and (3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1570, § 181, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-306.5 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-107.5. Licensure. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3645, § 23, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1571, § 182, effective July 1.

27-81-108. Acceptance for treatment - rules.

The commissioner shall adopt and may amend and repeal rules for acceptance of persons into the substance use disorder treatment program, considering available treatment resources and facilities, for the purpose of early and effective treatment of persons with substance use disorders, persons intoxicated by alcohol, and persons under the influence of drugs. In establishing the rules, the following standards guide the commissioner:

If possible a patient shall be treated on a voluntary rather than an involuntary basis.

Qualified staff shall assess the proper level of care for the person pursuant to rules adopted by the commissioner and make a referral for placement.

A person must not be denied treatment solely because the person has withdrawn from treatment against medical advice on a prior occasion or because the person has relapsed after earlier treatment.

An individualized treatment plan shall be prepared and maintained on a current basis for each patient.

Provision shall be made for a continuum of coordinated treatment services, so that a person who leaves a facility or a form of treatment will have available and utilize other appropriate treatment.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 738, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1367, § 277, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1397, § 17, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1571, § 183, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-307 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-81-109. Voluntary treatment of persons with substance use disorders.

A person with a substance use disorder, including a minor, may apply for voluntary treatment directly to an approved treatment facility.

Subject to rules adopted by the commissioner, the administrator in charge of an approved treatment facility shall determine who is admitted for treatment. If a person is refused admission to an approved treatment facility, the administrator may refer the person to another approved and appropriate treatment facility for treatment if it is deemed likely to be beneficial. A person must not be referred for further treatment if it is determined that further treatment is not likely to bring about significant improvement in the person's condition, or treatment is no longer appropriate, or further treatment is unlikely to be beneficial.

If a patient receiving residential care leaves an approved treatment facility, the person is encouraged to consent to outpatient treatment or supportive services, if appropriate.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 738, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1368, § 278, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1397, § 18, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1571, § 184, effective July 1.

27-81-110. Voluntary treatment for persons intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances.

A person intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances, including a minor if provided by rules of the BHA, may voluntarily admit the person's self to an approved treatment facility for an emergency evaluation to determine need for treatment.

The administrator shall immediately evaluate or examine a person who voluntarily enters an approved treatment facility. If the person is found to be in need of treatment, the administrator shall admit the person or refer the person to another appropriate facility. If a person is found not to be in need of treatment, the administrator shall release the person and may refer the person to another appropriate facility.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a treatment facility shall immediately release a voluntarily admitted person upon the person's request.

A person who is not admitted to an approved treatment facility or referred to another health facility, and who has no money, may be taken to the person's home, if any. If the person has no home, the approved treatment facility may assist the person in obtaining shelter.

If a person is admitted to an approved treatment facility, the person's family or next of kin must be notified as promptly as possible in accordance with federal confidentiality regulations for substance use disorder patient records, which regulations are found at 42 CFR part 2, as amended. If an adult person requests that there be no notification, the adult person's request must be respected.

If the administrator determines that it is for the person's benefit, the person must be encouraged to agree to further diagnosis and appropriate voluntary treatment.

Nothing in this section precludes the administrator from seeking emergency commitment of a person as provided in section 27-81-111 or involuntary commitment of a person as provided in section 27-81-112, regardless of whether the person has been voluntarily admitted under this section. In such case, the administrator's further conduct is governed by section 27-81-111 or 27-81-112, as applicable.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 738, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2020:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1398, § 19, effective July 13.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1572, § 185, effective July 1.

27-81-111. Emergency commitment.

When a person is under the influence of or incapacitated by substances and clearly dangerous to the health and safety of himself, herself, or others, law enforcement authorities or an emergency service patrol, acting with probable cause, shall take the person into protective custody in an approved treatment facility. If no such facilities are available, the person may be detained in an emergency medical facility or jail, but only for so long as may be necessary to prevent injury to himself, herself, or others or to prevent a breach of the peace. If the person being detained is a juvenile, as defined in section 19-2.5-102, the juvenile must be placed in a setting that is nonsecure and physically segregated by sight and sound from the adult offenders. A law enforcement officer or emergency service patrol officer, in detaining the person, is taking the person into protective custody. In so doing, the detaining officer may protect himself or herself by reasonable methods but shall make every reasonable effort to protect the detainee's health and safety. A taking into protective custody pursuant to this section is not an arrest, and an entry or other record shall not be made to indicate that the person has been arrested or charged with a crime. Law enforcement or emergency service personnel who act in compliance with this section are acting in the course of their official duties and are not criminally or civilly liable. Nothing in this subsection (1) precludes a person intoxicated by alcohol, under the influence of drugs, or incapacitated by substances who is not dangerous to the health and safety of himself, herself, or others from being assisted to the person's home or like location by the law enforcement officer or emergency service patrol officer.

A sheriff or police chief who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section related to detaining juveniles may be subject to a civil fine of no more than one thousand dollars. The decision to fine shall be based on prior violations of the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section by the sheriff or police chief and the willingness of the sheriff or police chief to address the violations in order to comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section.

A law enforcement officer, emergency service patrol officer, physician, spouse, guardian, or relative of the person to be committed or any other responsible person may make a written application for emergency commitment under this section, directed to the administrator of the approved treatment facility. The application must state the circumstances requiring emergency commitment, including the applicant's personal observations and the specific statements of others, if any, upon which the applicant relies in making the application. A copy of the application must be furnished to the person to be committed.

If the administrator approves the application, the administrator shall commit, evaluate, and treat the person for a period not to exceed five days. A peace officer, the emergency service patrol, or any interested person shall bring the person to the facility. If necessary, the court may be contacted to issue an order to the police, the peace officer's department, or the sheriff's department to transport the person to the facility.

If the administrator determines that the application fails to sustain the grounds for emergency commitment as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall refuse the commitment, immediately release the detained person, and encourage the person to seek voluntary treatment, if appropriate.

When the administrator determines that the grounds for commitment no longer exist, the administrator shall discharge the person committed under this section. A person committed under this section must not be detained in any treatment facility for more than five days; except that a person may be detained for longer than five days at the approved treatment facility if, in that period of time, a petition for involuntary commitment has been filed pursuant to section 27-81-112. A person must not be detained longer than ten days, excluding weekends and holidays, after the date of filing of the petition for involuntary commitment unless a valid medical reason exists for detaining a person longer.

Whenever a person is involuntarily detained pursuant to this section, the administrator shall, within twenty-four hours after detainment, advise the person who is involuntarily detained, both orally and in writing, of the person's right to challenge the detention by application to the courts for a writ of habeas corpus, to be represented by counsel at every stage of any proceedings relating to commitment and recommitment, and to have counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court if the person wants the assistance of counsel and is unable to obtain counsel.

Any law enforcement officer, emergency service personnel, physician, spouse, guardian, or relative of any person to be committed; any treatment facility administrator or the administrator's designee; or any other employee or person acting on behalf of an approved treatment facility, participating in or carrying out the emergency commitment or treatment as described in this section, whether acting individually or in his or her official capacity, is not criminally or civilly liable therefor.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 739, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1399, § 20, effective July 13.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 749, § 132, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-310 as it existed prior to 2010.